sl-SI: Material ure/paščka: Alkantara; Platno; Umetno usnje; Usnje; Mreža; Kovina; Mikrovlakna; Najlon; Plastika; Poliamid (PA); Polikarbonat (PC); Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Silikon; Nerjavno jeklo; Termoplastični elastomer (TPE); Termoplastični poliuretan (TPU); Titan; Vinil; Drugo
hr-HR: Materijal remena/sata: Alkantara; Platno; Umjetna koža; Koža; Mrežica; Metal; Mikrovlakna; Najlon; Plastika; Poliamid (PA); Polikarbonat (PC); Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Silikon; Nehrđajući čelik; Termoplastični elastomer (TPE); Termoplastični poliuretan (TPU); Titanij; Vinil; Ostalo
sv: Klocka/band - material: Alcantara; Kanvas; Fuskläder; Läder; Mesh; Metall; Mikrofiber; Nylon; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polykarbonat (PC); Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Silikon; Rostfritt stål; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Titan; Vinyl; Annat
zh-CN: 手表/表带材质: 阿尔坎塔拉; 画布; 人造皮革; 皮革; 网状; 金属; 超细纤维; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚酰胺 (PA); 聚碳酸酯 (PC); 聚酯纤维; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡胶; 硅胶; 不锈钢; 热塑性弹性体 (TPE); 热塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 钛; 乙烯基贴纸; 其他
lt-LT: Laikrodžio / dirželio medžiaga: Alkantara; Drobė; Dirbtinė oda; Oda; Tinklelis; Metalas; Mikropluoštas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Poliamidas (PA); Polikarbonatas (PC); Poliesteris; Poliuretanas (PU); Kaučiukas; Silikonas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Termoplastinis elastomeras (TPE); Termoplastinis poliuretanas (TPU); Titanas; Vinilas; Kita
fi: Kellon/hihnan materiaali: Alcantara; Kanvaasi; Keinonahka; Nahka; Verkko; Metalli; Mikrokuitu; Nailon; Muovi; Polyamidi (PA); Polykarbonaatti (PC); Polyesteri; Polyuretaani (PU); Kumi; Silikoni; Ruostumaton teräs; Termoplastinen elastomeeri (TPE); Termoplastinen polyuretaani (TPU); Titaani; Vinyyli; Muu
ro-RO: Material curea pentru ceas: Alcantara; Pânză; Imitație de piele; Piele; Plasă; Metal; Microfiber; Nailon; Plastic; Poliamidă (PA); Policarbonat (PC); Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Cauciuc; Silicon; Oțel inoxidabil; Elastomer termoplastic (TPE); Poliuretan termoplastic (TPU); Titan; Vinyl; Altele
da: Ur-/remmateriale: Alcantara; Lærred; Kunstigt læder; Læder; Mesh; Metal; Mikrofiber; Nylon; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polycarbonat (PC); Polyester; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Silikone; Rustfrit stål; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Termoplastisk polyurethan (TPU); Titanium; Vinyl; Andet
tr: Saat/Kordon malzemesi: Alcantara; Tuval; Suni deri; Deri; Ağ; Metal; Mikrofiber; Plastik; Plastik; Poliamid (PA); Polikarbonat (PC); Poliyester; Poliüretan (PU); Kauçuk; Silikon; Paslanmaz çelik; Termoplastik elastomer (TPE); Termoplastik poliüretan (TPU); Titanyum; Vinil; Diğer
el: Υλικό λουριού ρολογιού: Αλκαντάρα; Καμβάς; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Δερμάτινο; Πλέγμα; Μέταλλο; Μικροΐνες; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυαμίδιο (PA); Πολυανθρακικό πολυμερές (PC); Πολυεστέρας; Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Καουτσούκ; Σιλικόνη; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Θερμοπλαστικό ελαστομερές (TPE); Θερμοπλαστική πολυουρεθάνη (TPU); Τιτάνιο; Βινύλιο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Materiál hodiniek/remienka: Alcantara; Plátno; Umelá koža; Koža; Sieťovina; Kov; Mikrovlákno; Nylon; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polykarbonát (PC); Polyester; Polyuretán (PU); Guma; Silikón; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Termoplastický elastomér (TPE); Termoplastický polyuretán (TPU); Titán; Vinyl; Iné
it: Materiale dell'orologio/cinturino: Alcantara; Tela; Ecopelle; Pelle; Mesh; Metallo; Microfibra; Nylon; Plastica; Poliammide (PA); Policarbonato (PC); Poliestere; Poliuretano (PU); Gomma; Silicone; Acciaio inossidabile; Elastomero termoplastico (TPE); Poliuretano termoplastico (TPU); Titanio; Vinile; Altro
ru: Материал часов/ремешка: Алькантара; Холщовая ткань; Искусственная кожа; Кожа; Сетка; Металл; Микрофибра; Нейлон; Пластик; Полиамид (ПА); Поликарбонат (ПК); Полиэстер; Полиуретан (ПУ); Резина; Силикон; Нержавеющая сталь; Термопластичный эластомер (ТПЭ); Термопластичный полиуретан (ТПУ); Титан; Винил; Другой
en: Watch/Band material: Alcantara; Canvas; Faux leather; Leather; Mesh; Metal; Microfiber; Nylon; Plastic; Polyamide (PA); Polycarbonate (PC); Polyester; Polyurethane (PU); Rubber; Silicone; Stainless steel; Thermoplastic elastomer (TPE); Thermoplastic polyurethane (TPU); Titanium; Vinyl; Other
zh-TW: 手錶/錶帶材質: 人造麂皮; 帆布; 人造皮; 皮製; 網布; 金屬; 超細纖維; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚醯胺 (PA); 聚碳酸酯 (PC); 聚酯; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡膠; 矽膠; 不銹鋼; 熱塑性彈性體 (TPE); 熱塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 鈦; 乙烯基; 其他
ko: 시계/밴드 소재: 알칸타라; 캔버스; 인조 가죽; 가죽; 메쉬; 금속; 극세사; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리아미드(PA); 폴리카보네이트(PC); 폴리에스테르; 폴리우레탄(PU); 고무; 실리콘; 스테인리스 스틸; 열가소성 엘라스토머(TPE); 열가소성 폴리우레탄(TPU); 티타늄; 비닐; 기타
bg-BG: Материал за часовник/каишка: Алкантара; Брезент; Изкуствена кожа; Кожа; Мрежа; Метал; Микрофибър; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полиамид (PA); Поликарбонат (PC); Полиестер; Полиуретан (PU); Каучук; Силикон; Неръждаема стомана; Термопластичен еластомер (TPE); Термопластичен полиуретан (TPU); Титан; Винил; Други
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำนาฬิกา/สาย: อัลคันทารา; ผ้าใบ; หนังเทียม; หนัง; ตาข่าย; โลหะ; ไมโครไฟเบอร์; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลิอะไมด์ (PA); โพลิคาร์บอเนต (PC); โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); ยาง; ซิลิโคน; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เทอร์โมพลาสติกเอลาสโตเมอร์ (TPE); เทอร์โมพลาสติกโพลิยูรีเทน (TPU); ไทเทเนียม; ไวนิล; อื่นๆ
de: Uhr-/Armbandmaterial: Alcantara; Leinwand; Kunstleder; Leder; Netz; Metall; Mikrofaser; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyamid (PA); Polycarbonat (PC); Polyester; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Silikon; Edelstahl; Thermoplastisches Elastomer (TPE); Thermoplastisches Polyurethan (TPU); Titan; Vinyl; Sonstiges
vi: Vật liệu đồng hồ/dây đeo: Alcantara; Toan; Da giả; Da; Lưới; Kim loại; Vải xơ vi mảnh; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyamide (PA); Polycarbonate (PC); Polyester; Polyurethane (PU); Cao su; Silicon; Thép không gỉ; Elastomer nhiệt dẻo (TPE); Polyurethane nhiệt dẻo (TPU); Titanium; Nhựa vinyl; Khác
es: Material del reloj/correa: Alcántara; Lienzo; Cuero sintético; Cuero; Malla; Metal; Microfibra; Nylon; Plástico; Poliamida (PA); Policarbonato (PC); Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Goma; Silicona; Acero inoxidable; Elastómero termoplástico (TPE); Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Titanio; Vinilo; Otros
ja: ウォッチ/バンド素材: アルカンターラ; キャンバス; フェイクレザー; レザー; メッシュ; 金属; マイクロファイバー; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリアミド (PA); ポリカーボネート (PC); ポリエステル; ポリウレタン (PU); ゴム; シリコーン; ステンレススチール; 熱可塑性エラストマー (TPE); 熱可塑性ポリウレタン (TPU); チタン; ビニール; その他
pl: Materiał zegarka/paska: Alcantara; Płótno; Skaj; Skórzane; Siatka; Metal; Mikrofibra; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliamid (PA); Poliwęglan (PC); Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Silikon; Stal nierdzewna; Elastomer termoplastyczny (TPE); Poliuretan termoplastyczny (TPU); Titanium; Winyl; Pozostałe
fr: Matériau de la montre/du bracelet: Alcantara; Toiles; Faux cuir; Cuir; A mailles; Métal; Microfibre; Nylon; Plastique; Polyamide (PA); Polycarbonate (PC); Polyester; Polyuréthane (PU); Caoutchouc; Silicone; Acier inoxydable; Élastomère thermoplastique (TPE); Polyuréthane thermoplastique (TPU); Titane; Vinyl; Autre
cs: Materiál hodinek/pásku: Alcantara; Plátno; Nepravá kůže; Kůže; Síťovina; Kov; Mikrovlákno; Nylon; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polykarbonát (PC); Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Guma; Silikon; Nerezová ocel; Termoplastický elastomer (TPE); Termoplastický polyuretan (TPU); Titanové; Vinylové; Jiné
pt-PT: Material do relógio e da correia: Alcantara; Tela; Couro falso; Pele; Rede; Metal; Microfibra; Náilon; Plástico; Poliamida (PA); Policarbonato (PC); Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Elastómero termoplástico (TPE); Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Titânio; Vinil; Outro
nl: Materiaal horloge/band: Alcantara; Canvas; Kunstleer; Leer; Gaas; Metaal; Microvezel; Nylon; Plastic; Polyamide (PA); Polycarbonaat (PC); Polyester; Polyurethaan (PU); Rubber; Siliconen; Roestvrij staal; Thermoplastisch elastomeer (TPE); Thermoplastisch polyurethaan (TPU); Titanium; Vinyl; Andere
hu: Óraszíj anyaga: Alcantara; Vászon; Műbőr; Bőr; Háló; Fém; Mikroszálas; Nejlon; Műanyag; Poliamid (PA); Polikarbonát (PC); Poliészter; Poliuretán (PU); Gumi; Szilikon; Rozsdamentes acél; Hőre lágyuló elasztomer (TPE); Hőre lágyuló poliuretán (TPU); Titán; Vinil; Egyéb
pt-BR: Material do relógio/pulseira: Alcantara; Tela; Couro falso; Couro; Malha; Metal; Microfibra; Nylon; Plástico; Poliamida (PA); Policarbonato (PC); Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Elastômero termoplástico (TPE); Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Titânio; Vinil; Outro
nb: Klokke/båndmateriale: Alcantara; Lerret; Kunstig lær; Skinn; Mesh; Metall; Mikrofiber; Nylon; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polykarbonat (PC); Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Silikon; Rustfritt stål; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Titan; Vinyl; Annen